Massachusetts, session 194th, S594.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Subsection 2 of section 2D of chapter 132A of the General Laws, as appearing in the 
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last sentence and replacing it with 
the following:- “The commissioner shall waive any charges or fees for parking passes for 
veterans as defined in section 6A of chapter 115.”